Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.01, subdivision 6c, is amended to read: Subd. 6c. Currently unavoidable use. "Currently unavoidable use" means a use of PFAS that is essential for the health, safety, or functioning of society and for which alternatives are not reasonably available. Currently unavoidable use may include consideration of the need to prevent or minimize potential pest resistance and the potentialnew text begin animal andnew text end human health and environmental impacts of alternative products.